District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.105

Sale of the bonds.

(a)

The bonds of any series may be sold at negotiated or competitive sale at, above, or below par, to one or more persons or entities, and upon terms that the Mayor considers to be in the best interests of the District.

(b)

The Mayor or an Authorized Delegate may execute, in connection with each sale of the bonds, offering documents on behalf of the District, may deem final any such offering document on behalf of the District for purposes of compliance with federal laws and regulations governing such matters and may authorize the distribution of the documents in connection with the sale of the bonds.

(c)

The Mayor is authorized to deliver the executed and sealed bonds, on behalf of the District, for authentication, and, after the bonds have been authenticated, to deliver the bonds to the original purchasers of the bonds upon payment of the purchase price.

(d)

The bonds shall not be issued until the Mayor receives an approving opinion from Bond Counsel as to the validity of the bonds and the eligibility of the bonds to be qualified zone academy bonds within the meaning of section 1397E(d)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, approved August 5, 1997 (111 Stat. 821; 26 U.S.C. § 1397E(d)(1)).

(e)

Unit A of Chapter 3 of this title and subchapter III-A of Chapter 3 of Title 47 [§ 47-351.01 et seq.], shall not apply to whatever contract the Mayor may from time to time enter, or the Mayor may determine to be necessary or appropriate, for purposes of this subchapter.

History

Oct. 18, 2005, D.C. Law 16-28, § 5, 52 DCR 8093